Oklahoma, session 2025, SB165.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.468 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge crossing over Interstate 240 on Interstate 40 in
Oklahoma County shall be designated as the “Donald Ray Ward Memorial
Bridge”. The Department of Transportation shall cause suitable
permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on the bridge.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AERONAUTICS AND TRANSPORTATION
February 17, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED






SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB165 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)